North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-01 General Provisions
16.1-01-11.
Certain questions not to be voted upon for three months.

Whenever at any election a bond issue or mill levy question has failed to receive the required number of votes for approval by the electors, the matter may not again be submitted to a vote until a period of at least three months has expired .

More than two elections on the same general matter may not be held within twelve consecutive calendar months.

If the matter to be placed before the electors for a third or subsequent time involves authorization for a school construction bond issuance in accordance with chapter 21-03, the board of the school district shall resubmit its school construction proposal to the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of obtaining the superintendent’s approval, in the same manner as required for an initial approval in accordance with section 15.1-36-01.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 2015, ch. 153, § 7, effective May 14, 2015; 2015, ch. 155, § 3, effective April 28, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 153, S.L. 2015 became effective May 14, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 153, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 155, S.L. 2015 became effective April 28, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 7 of chapter 155, S.L. 2015.

Note.

Section 16.1-01-11 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 153, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 3 of Chapter 155, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2178.

16.1-01-12.
Election offenses — Penalty.

It is unlawful for an individual, measure committee as described in section 16.1-08.1-01, or other organization to:

Fraudulently alter another individual’s ballot substitute one ballot for another, or otherwise defraud a voter of that voter’s vote.

Obstruct a qualified elector on the way to a polling place.

Vote more than once in any election.

Knowingly vote in the wrong election precinct or district.

Disobey the lawful command of an election officer as defined in chapter 16.1-05.

Knowingly exclude a qualified elector from voting or knowingly allow an unqualified individual to vote.

Knowingly vote when not qualified to do so.

Sign an initiative, referendum, recall, or any other election petition when not qualified to do so.

Circulate an initiative, referendum, recall, or any other election petition not in its entirety or when unqualified to do so.

Pay or offer to pay any individual, measure committee, or other organization, or receive payment or agree to receive payment, on a basis related to the number of signatures obtained for circulating an initiative, referendum, or recall petition. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of salary and expenses for circulation of the petition on a basis not related to the number of signatures obtained, as long as the circulators file the intent to remunerate before submitting the petitions and, in the case of initiative and referendum petitions, fully disclose all contributions received pursuant to chapter 16.1-08.1 to the secretary of state upon submission of the petitions. The disclosure of contributions received under this section does not affect the requirement to file a pre-election report by individuals or organizations soliciting or accepting contributions for the purpose of aiding or opposing the circulation or passage of a statewide initiative or referendum petition or measure placed upon a statewide ballot by action of the legislative assembly under chapter 16.1-08.1. Any signature obtained in violation of this subdivision is void and may not be counted.

Willfully fail to perform any duty of an election officer after having accepted the responsibility of being an election officer by taking the oath as prescribed in this title.

Willfully violate any rule adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to this title.

Willfully make any false canvass of votes, or make, sign, publish, or deliver any false return of an election, knowing the canvass or return to be false; or willfully deface, destroy, or conceal any statement or certificate entrusted to the individual’s or organization’s care.

Destroy ballots, ballot boxes, election lists, or other election supplies except as provided by law, or negatively impact the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of any system used for voting.

Sign a name other than that individual’s own name to an initiative, referendum, recall, or any other election petition.

A violation of subdivisions b, e, f, or h through l of subsection 1 is a class A misdemeanor.

A violation of subdivisions a, c, d, g, or m of subsection 1 is a class C felony.

A violation of subdivision n of subsection 1 is a class C felony.

A violation of subdivision o of subsection 1 is a class A misdemeanor if an individual signs one or two names other than the individual’s own name to a petition and is a class C felony if an individual signs more than two names other than the individual’s own name to a petition.

An organization, as defined in section 12.1-03-04, that violates this section is subject to the organizational fines in section 12.1-32-01.1. The court in which the conviction is entered shall notify the secretary of state of the conviction and shall order the secretary of state to revoke the certificate of authority of any convicted organization or limited liability company. The organization may not reapply to the secretary of state for authorization to do business under any name for one year upon conviction of a class A misdemeanor and for five years upon conviction of a class C felony under this section.

An individual who is a member of an organization may be convicted of a violation as an accomplice under section 12.1-03-01.

Every act this chapter makes criminal when committed with reference to the election of a candidate is equally criminal when committed with reference to the determination of a question submitted to qualified electors to be decided by votes cast at an election.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 40; 1987, ch. 244, § 1; 2001, ch. 202, § 1; 2013, ch. 166, § 1; 2015, ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 152, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 164, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Electronic voting systems, violations, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-06-25.

16.1-01-13.
Term limits for United States senators and representatives in Congress.

A person is permanently ineligible to have that person’s name placed on the ballot at any election for the office of United States senator or representative in Congress if, by the start of the term for which the election is being held, that person will have served as a United States senator or a representative in Congress, or in any combination of those offices, for at least twelve years.

Source:

I.M. approved November 3, 1992, S.L. 1993, ch. 652, § 1.

Note.

Section 2 of the initiated measure, which enacted section 16.1-01-13.1, provides in part:

“If section 16.1-01-13 of the North Dakota Century Code, as enacted by section 1 of this measure, is held to be unconstitutional, section 16.1-01-13.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted to read as follows…” See section 16.1-01-13.1, set out following this section.

16.1-01-13.1.
(See note for contingent effective date) Term limits for United States senators and representatives in Congress.

A person is ineligible to have that person’s name placed on the ballot at any election for the office of United States senator or representative in Congress if, by the start of the term for which the election is being held, that person will have served as a United States senator or a representative in Congress, or in any combination of those offices, for at least twelve years. However, if that person is still otherwise eligible to hold the office, the disqualification imposed by this section ceases after two years have elapsed since the disqualification last affected that person’s eligibility for placement on the ballot.

Source:

I.M. approved November 3, 1992, S.L. 1993, ch. 652, § 2.

Note.

Section 2 of the initiated measure, which enacted this section, provides in part: “If section 16.1-01-13 of the North Dakota Century Code, as enacted by section 1 of this measure, is held to be unconstitutional, section 16.1-01-13.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted to read as follows…”. See section 16.1-01-13, set out preceding this section.

16.1-01-14.
Statement of intent.

In enacting this measure, the people of North Dakota:

Recognize that, along with the rest of the people of the United States, we have bestowed certain powers on the state and federal governments, and the governmental power flows ultimately from the people, not to them.

Do so in the partial exercise of our duty to elect representatives in Congress, under article I, section 2 of the Constitution of the United States, and our duty to elect United States senators, under the seventeenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States.

Recognize that the United States Supreme Court has never held that the people of a state do not have the constitutional power to establish term limits for federal legislators from their state.

Recognize that certain restrictions are placed on our ability to choose federal legislators, such that we could not, for example, elect a person twenty-eight years old to the senate or require a religious test for a federal legislator.

Assert that, aside from the requirements explicitly imposed by the Constitution of the United States, our power with respect to election of federal legislators is plenary.

Note that, under the Constitution of the United States, we have certain rights to control suffrage in elections, regulating such matters as residency, ballot access, and voting methods. As the possessors of the power to regulate suffrage, we also have the power to regulate certain qualifications of the agents we appoint by exercising our suffrage.

Exercise the legislative power we reserved to ourselves in section 1 of article III of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Recognize that, just as the federal Hatch Act [5 U.S.C. 7324 et seq.] restricts the candidacies of otherwise eligible persons from holding elected office, we have the same salutary purpose as does the Hatch Act, namely preventing an incumbent party from using government power to entrench itself permanently into government office.

Are mindful of the United States Supreme Court’s statement, in Garcia v. San Antonio Metro Transit Authority, 469 U.S. 528, 551 (1985), that state control of the election process is supposed to be a protection of the state peoples from the national government.

Recognize that increased concentration of power in the hands of incumbents has made this state’s electoral system less free, less competitive, and most importantly, less representative.

Recognize that our interests are best served by having our United States senators and representatives in Congress be mindful of their origins and return to our ranks whence they came.

Make the following declarations and historical findings:

James Madison, in No. 57 of The Federalist Papers, predicted that the house of representatives would always be responsive to the will of the people because that house would be bound by the same laws they impose on the people. President Madison’s prediction was wrong and Congress has arrogated to itself powers not granted to the people, a recent notorious example being the bank of the house of representatives in which members were allowed to kite checks. President Madison’s prediction was wrong in that Congress has oppressed the people with laws from which it exempts itself, recent examples including minimum wage, discrimination, occupational safety, and other laws.

The appearance of corruption and the lack of competitiveness for entrenched incumbency seats has lessened voter participation and that is counterproductive to the purposes of a representative republic.

Our vital interests in maintaining the integrity of the political process have been harmed by these and other factors. Therefore, term limitation is the best method by which we can ensure that our vital interests are guarded.

Believe this measure is constitutional and intend it to be so. Therefore, even if a court holds any portion of this measure unconstitutional, thereby substituting its own judgment for that we have expressed in enacting this measure, the legislative council shall require the publisher of the North Dakota Century Code to include the text of this measure, in the manner as if not so held but with appropriate annotation, to stand as a testament to our expressed will, and as a memorial to the defiance of that will by whatever court holds this measure unconstitutional. Furthermore, if any part of this measure is held unconstitutional, we intend that the rest of it be deemed effective, to the maximum extent permitted under section 1-02-20.

Source:

I.M. approved November 3, 1992, S.L. 1993, ch. 652, § 3.

16.1-01-15.
Secretary of state to establish and maintain an election fund.

The secretary of state shall establish and maintain a fund, known as the election fund, in the state treasury for the purpose of depositing payments and grants made to the state under the provisions of sections 101, 101(c), and 906, and title III of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 [Pub. L. 107-252; 116 Stat. 1666; 42 U.S.C. 15301, 42 U.S.C. 15545, 42 U.S.C. 15481-15502] and funds appropriated by the state. The moneys in the election fund and any interest earnings on the election fund must be used for the exclusive purpose of carrying out activities of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 and are subject to chapter 54-16.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 171, § 3; 2009, ch. 2, § 6.

Collateral References.

Preemption of State Election Laws By Help America Vote Act. 47 A.L.R. Fed 2d 81.

16.1-01-15.1.
Use of nonpublic funds prohibited — Penalty.

The state and political subdivisions may not solicit, accept, or use any grants or donations from private persons for elections operations or administration except:.

The use of privately owned facilities for polling places;

Food for poll workers; and

Other nonmonetary donations that are not used to prepare, process, mark, collect, or tabulate ballots or votes.

An individual who knowingly violates subsection 1 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 164, § 16, effective August 1, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 156, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 16.1-01-15.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 16 of Chapter 164, Session Laws 2021, Bill 1253; and Section 1 of Chapter 166, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1256.

16.1-01-16.
Secretary of state to establish a uniform state-based administrative complaint procedure.

The secretary of state shall establish a uniform state-based administrative complaint procedure to remedy grievances according to section 402 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 [Pub. L. 107-252; 116 Stat. 1666; 42 U.S.C. 15512]. The complaint procedure must be uniform and nondiscriminatory and address complaints of violations of any provision of title III of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, including a violation that has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur. A complaint filed under the complaint procedure must be in writing and notarized, and be signed and sworn by the individual filing the complaint. The secretary of state may consolidate complaints. At the request of a complainant, the secretary of state shall establish a procedure for providing a review on the record. If the secretary of state determines there is a violation of a provision of title III of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 [Pub. L. 107-252; 116 Stat. 1666; 42 U.S.C. 15481-15502], the secretary of state shall determine and provide an appropriate remedy. If the secretary of state determines a violation of title III of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 has not occurred, the secretary of state shall dismiss the complaint and publish the results of the review. The secretary of state shall make a final determination with respect to a complaint within ninety days of the date the complaint is filed with the secretary of state, unless the complainant consents to a longer period of time for the secretary of state to make a determination. If the secretary of state fails to meet the ninety-day deadline for determining a complaint, the complaint must be resolved within sixty days under an alternative dispute resolution procedure.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 171, § 4; 2021, ch. 164, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Preemption of State Election Laws By Help America Vote Act. 47 A.L.R. Fed 2d 81.

16.1-01-17.
Estimated fiscal impact of an initiated or referred measure.

As soon as practicable after the secretary of state approves an initiated or referred measure for the ballot, the legislative council shall coordinate the determination of the estimated fiscal impact of the initiated or referred measure. Upon notification from the secretary of state that signed petitions have been submitted for placement of an initiated or referred measure on the ballot, the legislative management shall hold hearings, receive public testimony, and gather information on the estimated fiscal impact of the measure. Each agency, institution, or department shall provide information requested in the format and time frame prescribed by the legislative council for identifying the estimated fiscal impact of the measure. At least thirty days before the public vote on the measure, the legislative council shall submit a statement of the estimated fiscal impact of the measure to the secretary of state. Upon receipt, the secretary of state shall include a notice within the analysis required by section 16.1-01-07 specifying where copies of the statement of the estimated fiscal impact can be obtained. Within thirty days of the close of the first complete fiscal year after the effective date of an initiated or referred measure approved by the voters, the agencies, institutions, or departments that provided the estimates of the fiscal impact of the measure to the legislative council under this section shall submit a report to the legislative council on the actual fiscal impact for the first complete fiscal year resulting from provisions of the initiated or referred measure and a comparison to the estimates provided to the legislative council under this section, and the legislative council shall issue a report of the actual fiscal impact of the initiated or referred measure.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 180, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 14; 2019, ch. 173, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 164, § 15, effective August 1, 2021.